District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.15

General Counsel.

(a)

The Corporation may have a General Counsel who shall:

(1)

Be appointed by the CEO;

(2)

Be an attorney admitted in good-standing to the practice of law in the District of Columbia;

(3)

Be qualified by experience and training to advise the Corporation with respect to legal issues related to its powers and duties;

(4)

Have an attorney-client relationship with the Corporation; and

(5)

Advocate vigorously for the positions of the Corporation on legal issues.

(b)

The General Counsel, with the consent of the CEO, may employ staff attorneys and other personnel.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5126, 58 DCR 6226